sk-SK: Forma produktu po holení: Balzam; Krém; Gél; Pleťová voda; Tonikum; Iné
hu: Borotválkozás utáni termék formája: Balzsam; Krém; Gél; Ápoló; Tonik; Egyéb
nl: Productvorm aftershave: Balsem; Crème; Gel; Lotion; Tonic; Andere
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์หลังโกนหนวด: บาล์ม; ครีม; เจล; โลชั่น; โทนิค; อื่นๆ
vi: Mẫu sản phẩm sau cạo râu: Dầu thơm; Kem; Gel; Dầu dưỡng; Tonic; Khác
cs: Forma přípravku po holení: Balzám; Smetana; Gel; Vlasové mléko; Tonikum; Jiné
el: Μορφή προϊόντος για μετά το ξύρισμα: Βάλσαμο; Κρέμα; Τζελ; Λοσιόν; Τονωτικό; Άλλο
de: Aftershave Produktform: Balsam; Creme; Gel; Lotion; Tonic; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Formulário de produto aftershave: Bálsamo; Creme; Gel; Loção; Tónico; Outro
ru: Тип средства после бритья: Бальзам; Крем; Гель; Лосьон; Тоник; Другое
en: Aftershave product form: Balm; Cream; Gel; Lotion; Tonic; Other
es: Forma del producto de loción para después del afeitado: Bálsamo; Crema; Gel; Loción; Tónico; Otros
sl-SI: Oblika izdelka za po britju: Balzam; Krema; Gel; Losjon; Tonik; Drugo
ja: アフターシェーブ商品フォーム: バーム; クリーム; ゲル; ローション; トニック; その他
sv: Produktform för aftershave: Balsam; Kräm; Gel; Lotion; Tonic; Övrigt
pl: Forma produktu po goleniu: Balsam; Krem; Żel; Balsam do ciała; Tonik; Inne
zh-TW: 鬚後水商品形式: 軟膏; 鮮奶油; 凝膠; 乳液; 生髮水; 其他
ko: 프터쉐이브 제품 형태: 밤; 크림; 젤; 로션; 토닉; 기타
bg-BG: Форма на афтършейва: Балсам; Крем; Гел; Лосион; Тоник; Други
nb: Produktform for aftershave: Balsam; Krem; Gel; Krem; Tonic; Annet
zh-CN: 须后产品形态: 香脂; 奶油; 发胶; 发露; 爽肤水; 其他
tr: Tıraş sonrası ürün formu: Balm; Krema; Jel; Losyon; Tonik; Diğer
fr: Forme du produit après-rasage: Baume; Crème; Gel; Lotion; Tonique; Autre
fi: Aftershave -tuotemuoto: Balsami; Kerma; Geeli; Voide; Tonic; Muu
da: Produktform for aftershave: Balsam; Fløde; Gel; Lotion; Tonic; Andet
it: Forma del prodotto dopobarba: Balsamo; Crema; Gel; Lozione; Tonico; Altro
lt-LT: Priemonės po skutimosi pavidalas: Balzamas; Kremas; Gelis; Losjonas; Tonikas; Kita
hr-HR: Oblik proizvoda za njegu poslije brijanja: Balzam; Krema; Gel; Losion; Tonik; Ostalo
pt-BR: Formato de produto pós-barba: Bálsamo; Creme; Gel; Loção; Tônico; Outro
ro-RO: Formă produs aftershave: Balsam; Cremă; Gel; Loțiune; Loțiune tonică; Altele